test/src/gt-norm-yamls/smj-tests-from-old-infra_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - bena: # -a stem, root vowel -e-, cons. grad. all Px, clitics
    # bena+N+Ess+Foc/ga: [benanga, bednaginga]
    # bena+N+Ess+Foc/ge: [benange, bednaginge]
    # bena+N+Ess+Foc/gen: [benangen, bednagingen]
    bena+N+Ess: [benan, bednagin]
    # bena+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/ga: [bednagijtagága, bednagijdagiga, bednagijdagága]
    # bena+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/ge: [bednagijtagáge, bednagijtagák, bednagijdagige, bednagijdagik, bednagijdagáge, bednagijdagák]
    # bena+N+Pl+Abe+Foc/gen: [bednagijtagágen, bednagijdagigen, bednagijdagágen]
    bena+N+Pl+Abe: [bednagijtagá, bednagijdagi, bednagijdagá]
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+Foc/ga: bednagijtga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+Foc/ge: bednagijtge
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+Foc/gen: bednagijtgen
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagijdemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagijdemage, bednagijdemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagijdemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: bednagijdema
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagijdedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagijdedage, bednagijdedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagijdedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: bednagijdeda
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagijdeskaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagijdeskage, bednagijdeskak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagijdeskagen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: bednagijdeska
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagijdemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagijdemage, bednagijdemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagijdemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: bednagijdema
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagijdedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagijdedage, bednagijdedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagijdedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: bednagijdeda
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagijdesaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagijdesage, bednagijdesak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagijdesagen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: bednagijdesa
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednagijdámga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednagijdámge
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednagijdámgen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: bednagijdám
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednagijdátga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednagijdátge
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednagijdátgen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: bednagijdát
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagijdesga
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagijdesge
    # bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagijdesgen
    bena+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: bednagijdes
    bena+N+Pl+Acc: bednagijt
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+Foc/ga: bednagijga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+Foc/ge: bednagijge
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gen: bednagijgen
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagijemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagijemage, bednagijemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagijemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bednagijema
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagijedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagijedage, bednagijedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagijedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu2: bednagijeda
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagijeskaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagijeskage, bednagijeskak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagijeskagen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxDu3: bednagijeska
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagijemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagijemage, bednagijemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagijemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: bednagijema
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagijedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagijedage, bednagijedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagijedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: bednagijeda
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagijesaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagijesage, bednagijesak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagijesagen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: bednagijesa
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednagijámga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednagijámge
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednagijámgen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: bednagijám
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednagijátga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednagijátge
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednagijátgen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: bednagiját
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagijesga
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagijesge
    # bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagijesgen
    bena+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: bednagijes
    bena+N+Pl+Com: bednagij
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/ga: bednagijsga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/ge: bednagijsge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gen: bednagijsgen
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagijstemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagijstemage, bednagijstemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagijstemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu1: bednagijstema
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagijstedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagijstedage, bednagijstedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagijstedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu2: bednagijsteda
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagijsteskaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagijsteskage, bednagijsteskak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagijsteskagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu3: bednagijsteska
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagijstemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagijstemage, bednagijstemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagijstemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: bednagijstema
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagijstedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagijstedage, bednagijstedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagijstedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: bednagijsteda
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagijstesaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagijstesage, bednagijstesak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagijstesagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: bednagijstesa
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednagijstámga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednagijstámge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednagijstámgen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: bednagijstám
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednagijstátga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednagijstátge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednagijstátgen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: bednagijstát
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagijstesga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagijstesge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagijstesgen
    bena+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: bednagijstes
    bena+N+Pl+Ela: bednagijs
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/ga: bednagijga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/ge: bednagijge
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gen: bednagijgen
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagijemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagijemage, bednagijemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagijemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: bednagijema
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagijedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagijedage, bednagijedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagijedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: bednagijeda
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagijeskaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagijeskage, bednagijeskak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagijeskagen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: bednagijeska
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagijemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagijemage, bednagijemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagijemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: bednagijema
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagijedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagijedage, bednagijedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagijedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: bednagijeda
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagijesaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagijesage, bednagijesak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagijesagen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: bednagijesa
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednagijámga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednagijámge
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednagijámgen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: bednagijám
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/ga: bednagijátga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/ge: bednagijátge
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/gen: bednagijátgen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: bednagiját
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagijesga
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagijesge
    # bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagijesgen
    bena+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: bednagijes
    bena+N+Pl+Gen: bednagij
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/ga: bednagijdaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/ge: [bednagijdage, bednagijdak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gen: bednagijdagen
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagijdasimmega
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagijdasimmege, bednagijdasimmek]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagijdasimmegen
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu1: bednagijdasimme
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagijdasihttega
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagijdasihttege, bednagijdasihttek]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagijdasihttegen
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu2: bednagijdasihtte
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagijdasiskaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagijdasiskage, bednagijdasiskak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagijdasiskagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxDu3: bednagijdasiska
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagijdasimmega
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagijdasimmege, bednagijdasimmek]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagijdasimmegen
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: bednagijdasimme
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagijdasihttega
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagijdasihttege, bednagijdasihttek]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagijdasihttegen
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: bednagijdasihtte
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagijdasisága
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagijdasiságe, bednagijdasisák]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagijdasiságen
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: bednagijdasisá
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/ga: [bednagijdasamga, bednagijdasimga]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/ge: [bednagijdasamge, bednagijdasimge]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/gen: [bednagijdasamgen, bednagijdasimgen]
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: [bednagijdasam, bednagijdasim]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/ga: [bednagijdasatga, bednagijdasitga]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/ge: [bednagijdasatge, bednagijdasitge]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/gen: [bednagijdasatgen, bednagijdasitgen]
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: [bednagijdasat, bednagijdasit]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/ga: bednagijdasisga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/ge: bednagijdasisge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/gen: bednagijdasisgen
    bena+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: bednagijdasis
    bena+N+Pl+Ill: bednagijda
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/ga: bednagijnga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/ge: bednagijnge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gen: bednagijngen
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu1+Foc/ga: bednagijnemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu1+Foc/ge: [bednagijnemage, bednagijnemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu1+Foc/gen: bednagijnemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu1: bednagijnema
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu2+Foc/ga: bednagijnedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu2+Foc/ge: [bednagijnedage, bednagijnedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu2+Foc/gen: bednagijnedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu2: bednagijneda
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu3+Foc/ga: bednagijneskaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu3+Foc/ge: [bednagijneskage, bednagijneskak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu3+Foc/gen: bednagijneskagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu3: bednagijneska
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/ga: bednagijnemaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/ge: [bednagijnemage, bednagijnemak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/gen: bednagijnemagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: bednagijnema
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/ga: bednagijnedaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/ge: [bednagijnedage, bednagijnedak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/gen: bednagijnedagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: bednagijneda
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/ga: bednagijnesaga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/ge: [bednagijnesage, bednagijnesak]
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/gen: bednagijnesagen
    bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: bednagijnesa
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/ga: bednagijnámga
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/ge: bednagijnámge
    # bena+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/gen: bednagijnámgen
